Hawaii statutes.
[§658F-3] Applicability. (a) Except
as otherwise provided in subsection (b), this chapter applies to a
foreign-country judgment to the extent that the judgment:

(1) Grants or denies recovery of a sum of money; and

(2) Under the law of the foreign country where
rendered, is final, conclusive, and enforceable.

(b) This chapter does not apply to a
foreign-country judgment, even if the judgment grants or denies recovery of a
sum of money, to the extent that the judgment is:

(1) A judgment for taxes;

(2) A fine or other penalty; or

(3) A judgment for divorce, support, or maintenance,
or other judgment rendered in connection with domestic relations.

(c) A party seeking recognition of a
foreign-country judgment has the burden of establishing that this chapter
applies to the foreign-country judgment. [L 2009, c 34, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next